California, session 20252026, AB2148.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 98 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 97, to read:98. Both of the following mean a natural person:(a) A public school employee, including, but not limited to, certificated employees, classified employees, teachers, educators, short-term employees, principals, administrators, counselors, school nurses, school psychologists, and school social workers.(b) A contractor performing services in a public school.